Massachusetts, session 194th, S293.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 138 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
section 78 the following section:-
Section 79. (a) The following words as used in this section, unless the context clearly
requires otherwise, shall have the following meanings:-
“Lid”, a removable cover of any size that attaches to the rim of a beverage. The lid is not
required to fit all containers in which alcoholic beverages are served on the premises but shall fit
at least one.
(b) Any establishment which sells alcoholic beverages to be drunk on the premises, shall,
upon request, provide a lid with a customer’s drink. The owner or person in charge of the
respective establishment shall post a notice informing patrons that lids are available in a
prominent and conspicuous location.
of 2

SECTION 2. This act shall go into effect 6 months after its enactment.
of 2